Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX vC Y 50
SFX vC mettre mettre/m't's' mettre is:infi
SFX vC mettre mettant/m't's' mettre is:ppre
SFX vC mettre mis mettre is:ppas is:mas is:inv
SFX vC mettre mise mettre is:ppas is:fem
SFX vC mettre mises mettre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX vC mettre mets/m' mettre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mets/t' mettre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX vC mettre met/s' mettre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mettent/s' mettre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mettais/m' mettre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mettais/t' mettre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mettait/s' mettre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mettaient/s' mettre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mis/m' mettre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mis/t' mettre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mit/s' mettre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mîmes mettre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mîtes mettre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mirent/s' mettre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mettrai/m' mettre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mettras/t' mettre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mettra/s' mettre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mettrons mettre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettrez mettre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mettront/s' mettre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mettrais/m' mettre is:cond is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mettrais/t' mettre is:cond is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mettrait/s' mettre is:cond is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mettrions mettre is:cond is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettriez mettre is:cond is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mettraient/s' mettre is:cond is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mette/m' mettre is:spre is:1sg
SFX vC mettre mettes/t' mettre is:spre is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mette/s' mettre is:spre is:3sg
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre is:spre is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre is:spre is:2pl
SFX vC mettre mettent/s' mettre is:spre is:3pl
SFX vC mettre misse/m' mettre is:simp is:1sg
SFX vC mettre misses/t' mettre is:simp is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mît/s' mettre is:simp is:3sg
SFX vC mettre missions mettre is:simp is:1pl
SFX vC mettre missiez mettre is:simp is:2pl
SFX vC mettre missent/s' mettre is:simp is:3pl
SFX vC mettre mets mettre is:impe is:2sg
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre is:impe is:1pl
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre is:impe is:2pl
SFX W. N 8
SFX W. 0 0 . is:fem is:sg
SFX W. e es e is:fem is:pl
SFX W. ce x ce is:mas is:inv
SFX W. use ux [eo]use is:mas is:inv
SFX W. ausse aux ausse is:mas is:inv
SFX W. ousse oux ousse is:mas is:inv
SFX W. ale al ale is:mas is:sg
SFX W. ale aux ale is:mas is:pl
SFX W* Y 7
SFX W* 0 0/D'L'Q' . is:fem is:sg
SFX W* e es/D'Q' e is:fem is:pl
SFX W* ce x/D'L'Q' ce is:mas is:inv
SFX W* use ux/D'L'Q' [eo]use is:mas is:inv
SFX W* ousse oux/D'L'Q' ousse is:mas is:inv
SFX W* ale al/D'L'Q' ale is:mas is:sg
SFX W* ale aux/D'Q' ale is:mas is:pl
SFX wA N 51
SFX wA eindre eindre eindre is:infi
SFX wA eindre eignant eindre is:ppre
SFX wA eindre eint eindre is:ppas is:mas
SFX wA eindre eints eindre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX wA eindre einte eindre is:ppas is:fem
SFX wA eindre eintes eindre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX wA eindre eins eindre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eins eindre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eint eindre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eignons eindre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eignez eindre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eignent eindre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eignais eindre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eignais eindre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eignait eindre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eignions eindre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eigniez eindre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eignaient eindre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eignis eindre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eignis eindre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eignit eindre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eignîmes eindre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eignîtes eindre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eignirent eindre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eindrai eindre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eindras eindre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eindra eindre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eindrons eindre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eindrez eindre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eindront eindre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eindrais eindre is:cond is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eindrais eindre is:cond is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eindrait eindre is:cond is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eindrions eindre is:cond is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eindriez eindre is:cond is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eindraient eindre is:cond is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eigne eindre is:spre is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eignes eindre is:spre is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eigne eindre is:spre is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eignions eindre is:spre is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eigniez eindre is:spre is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eignent eindre is:spre is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eignisse eindre is:simp is:1sg
SFX wA eindre eignisses eindre is:simp is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eignît eindre is:simp is:3sg
SFX wA eindre eignissions eindre is:simp is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eignissiez eindre is:simp is:2pl
SFX wA eindre eignissent eindre is:simp is:3pl
SFX wA eindre eins eindre is:impe is:2sg
SFX wA eindre eignons eindre is:impe is:1pl
SFX wA eindre eignez eindre is:impe is:2pl
SFX wB Y 51
SFX wB indre indre/n'q'd'l'm't's' indre is:infi
SFX wB indre ignant/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ppre
SFX wB indre int/q' indre is:ppas is:mas
SFX wB indre ints/q' indre is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX wB indre inte/q' indre is:ppas is:fem
SFX wB indre intes/q' indre is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX wB indre ins/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:ipre is:1sg
SFX wB indre ins/n'q'l'm't' indre is:ipre is:2sg
SFX wB indre int/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ipre is:3sg
SFX wB indre ignons/n'q'l't' indre is:ipre is:1pl
SFX wB indre ignez/n'q'l'm' indre is:ipre is:2pl
SFX wB indre ignent/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ipre is:3pl
SFX wB indre ignais/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:iimp is:1sg
SFX wB indre ignais/n'q'l'm't' indre is:iimp is:2sg
SFX wB indre ignait/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:iimp is:3sg
SFX wB indre ignions/n'q'l't' indre is:iimp is:1pl
SFX wB indre igniez/n'q'l'm' indre is:iimp is:2pl
SFX wB indre ignaient/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:iimp is:3pl
SFX wB indre ignis/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX wB indre ignis/n'q'l'm't' indre is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX wB indre ignit/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX wB indre ignîmes/n'q'l't' indre is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX wB indre ignîtes/n'q'l'm' indre is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX wB indre ignirent/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX wB indre indrai/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:ifut is:1sg
SFX wB indre indras/n'q'l'm't' indre is:ifut is:2sg
SFX wB indre indra/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ifut is:3sg
SFX wB indre indrons/n'q'l't' indre is:ifut is:1pl
SFX wB indre indrez/n'q'l'm' indre is:ifut is:2pl
SFX wB indre indront/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:ifut is:3pl
SFX wB indre indrais/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:cond is:1sg
SFX wB indre indrais/n'q'l'm't' indre is:cond is:2sg
SFX wB indre indrait/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:cond is:3sg
SFX wB indre indrions/n'q'l't' indre is:cond is:1pl
SFX wB indre indriez/n'q'l'm' indre is:cond is:2pl
SFX wB indre indraient/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:cond is:3pl
SFX wB indre igne/n'j'l'm't' indre is:spre is:1sg
SFX wB indre ignes/n'l'm't' indre is:spre is:2sg
SFX wB indre igne/n'l'm't's' indre is:spre is:3sg
SFX wB indre ignions/n'l't' indre is:spre is:1pl
SFX wB indre igniez/n'l'm' indre is:spre is:2pl
SFX wB indre ignent/n'l'm't's' indre is:spre is:3pl
SFX wB indre ignisse/n'q'j'l'm't' indre is:simp is:1sg
SFX wB indre ignisses/n'q'l'm't' indre is:simp is:2sg
SFX wB indre ignît/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:simp is:3sg
SFX wB indre ignissions/n'q'l't' indre is:simp is:1pl
SFX wB indre ignissiez/n'q'l'm' indre is:simp is:2pl
SFX wB indre ignissent/n'q'l'm't's' indre is:simp is:3pl
SFX wB indre ins/n'l'm't' indre is:impe is:2sg
SFX wB indre ignons/n'l' indre is:impe is:1pl
SFX wB indre ignez/n'l'm' indre is:impe is:2pl
