Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
absidale/W*() po:adj
aciéreuse/W*() po:adj
adénovirale/W*() po:adj
adjectivale/W*() po:adj
adjoindre/wB() po:v3tp
affectueuse/W*() po:adj
agrammaticale/W*() po:adj
alcalino-terreuse/W*() po:adj
altitudinale/W*() po:adj
amirale/W*() po:nom
anale/W*() po:adj
anfractueuse/W*() po:adj
annale/W*() po:adj
anormale/W*() po:nom po:adj
anticlinale/W*() po:adj
antigouvernementale/W*() po:adj
antimorale/W*() po:adj
antirétrovirale/W*() po:adj
antivénéneuse/W*() po:adj
aphteuse/W*() po:adj
archétypale/W*() po:adj
areligieuse/W*() po:adj
arsénieuse/W*() po:adj
asociale/W*() po:nom po:adj
astreindre/wB() po:v3tp
atonale/W*() po:adj
atteindre/wB() po:v3tî
auriculo-temporale/W*() po:adj
autosomale/W*() po:adj
aventureuse/W*() po:nom po:adj
besogneuse/W.() po:adj
bifocale/W.() po:adj
binomiale/W.() po:adj
boiteuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
brachiale/W.() po:adj
buccale/W.() po:adj
cadavéreuse/W.() po:adj
califale/W.() po:adj
capitale/W.() po:nom po:adj
cardinale/W.() po:adj
cataméniale/W.() po:adj
caverneuse/W.() po:adj
ceindre/wB() po:v3tp
centrale/W.() po:nom po:adj
cespiteuse/W.() po:adj
chichiteuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
classieuse/W.() po:adj
coliqueuse/W.() po:adj
comateuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
comportementale/W.() po:adj
conjoindre/wB() po:v3t
conjugale/W.() po:adj
cordiale/W.() po:nom po:adj
crapuleuse/W.() po:adj
curiale/W.() po:adj
dentale/W.() po:adj
dépeindre/wB() po:v3t
déteindre/wB() po:v3it
difficultueuse/W.() po:adj
disjoindre/wB() po:v3tp
dorsale/W.() po:nom po:adj
écailleuse/W*() po:adj
eczémateuse/W*() po:nom po:adj
ellipsoïdale/W*() po:adj
empreindre/wB() po:v3tp
enceindre/wB() po:v3t
endothéliale/W*() po:adj
enfreindre/wB() po:v3t
enjoindre/wB() po:v3t
entéro-rénale/W*() po:adj
entremettre/vC() po:v3p
épicentrale/W*() po:adj
épithéliale/W*() po:adj
érugineuse/W*() po:adj
éteindre/wB() po:v3tp
ethmoïdale/W*() po:adj
étreindre/wB() po:v3tp
expérimentale/W*() po:adj
extra-légale/W*() po:adj
extrémale/W*() po:adj
factieuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
feindre/wB() po:v3it
férale/W.() po:adj
flegmoneuse/W.() po:adj
frauduleuse/W.() po:adj
gastroduodénale/W.() po:adj
geindre/wA() po:v3it
gingivale/W.() po:adj
goudronneuse/W.() po:adj
grisouteuse/W.() po:adj
harmonieuse/W*() po:adj
herbeuse/W*() po:adj
hiatale/W*() po:adj
hivernale/W*() po:adj
hormonale/W*() po:adj
hydrominérale/W*() po:adj
hypernerveuse/W*() po:adj
ichoreuse/W*() po:adj
iléocæcale/W*() po:adj
imaginale/W*() po:adj
impécunieuse/W*() po:adj
impétueuse/W*() po:adj
incrémentale/W*() po:adj
infectieuse/W*() po:adj
infructueuse/W*() po:adj
initiale/W*() po:nom po:adj
insomnieuse/W*() po:nom po:adj
interastrale/W*() po:adj
intercostale/W*() po:adj
intergouvernementale/W*() po:adj
interorbitale/W*() po:adj
interrégionale/W*() po:adj
intertropicale/W*() po:adj
intracérébrale/W*() po:adj
irréligieuse/W*() po:adj
isospectrale/W*() po:adj
jardineuse/W.() po:adj
joindre/wB() po:v3itp
laborieuse/W.() po:adj
létale/W.() po:adj
liquoreuse/W.() po:adj
luxueuse/W.() po:adj
marécageuse/W.() po:adj
maxillofaciale/W.() po:adj
médullosurrénale/W.() po:adj
minérale/W.() po:adj
monocamérale/W.() po:adj
moyenâgeuse/W.() po:adj
mystérieuse/W.() po:adj
neuronale/W.() po:adj
nuageuse/W.() po:adj
obstétricale/W*() po:adj
ocreuse/W*() po:adj
œdémateuse/W*() po:adj
ogivale/W*() po:adj
oindre/wB() po:v3tp
ombilicale/W*() po:adj
onctueuse/W*() po:adj
orageuse/W*() po:adj
ornementale/W*() po:adj
parachutale/W.() po:adj
parodontale/W.() po:adj
peindre/wB() po:v3itp
pellagreuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
peureuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
planétésimale/W.() po:adj
poindre/wB() po:v3it
poisseuse/W.() po:adj
post-doctorale/W.() po:adj
préfrontale/W.() po:adj
procédurale/W.() po:adj
pseudomembraneuse/W.() po:adj
raciale/W.() po:adj
rejoindre/wB() po:v3tp
repeindre/wB() po:v3it
restreindre/wB() po:v3tp
reteindre/wB() po:v3t
réticuloendothéliale/W.() po:adj
rougeoleuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
sacrale/W.() po:adj
scapulohumérale/W.() po:adj
sénatoriale/W.() po:adj
siliceuse/W.() po:adj
sommitale/W.() po:adj
sphénoïdale/W.() po:adj
stomacale/W.() po:adj
suiffeuse/W.() po:adj
synodale/W.() po:adj
teindre/wB() po:v3tp
ténébreuse/W.() po:nom po:adj
tortueuse/W.() po:adj
trilatérale/W.() po:adj
ulcéreuse/W*() po:adj
urétérale/W*() po:adj
uxorilocale/W*() po:adj
vaporeuse/W.() po:adj
verbeuse/W.() po:adj
vicariale/W.() po:adj
virilocale/W.() po:adj
